Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-162.05
Board of Regents; State Forester; duties.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, with the advice of the State Forester, shall (1) prescribe and implement procedures relating to the implementation and administration of sections 85-162.01 to 85-162.05 and (2) enter into any arrangements and activities it may deem desirable in implementing and carrying out the intent and purposes contemplated by legislation of the federal government calling for state cooperation in the promotion of desirable practices of forestry, forestation, forest management, harvesting, processing, and marketing of forest products, control of forest pests, insects, and disease, prevention and suppression of wildland fires, watershed management, and windbreak establishment and care.

Laws 1967, c. 585, § 5, p. 1975;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 85-163.06;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 413.